src/verbs_rules.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +Sg +Pl +Pres +Ind +Inf +ar +er +ir

LEXICON Root
Verbs;

Lexicon Verbs

anar	Verb;
cantar	Verb;
estar	Verb;
parlar	Verb;

LEXICON Verb

+V+1p+Sg+Pres+Inf:0					#;
+V+ar+1p+Sg+Pres+Gerund:^ant		#;
+V+er+1p+Sg+Pres+Gerund:^ent		#;
+V+ir+1p+Sg+Pres+Gerund:^int		#;
